Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.030

Submitting system or component for examination.

The manufacturer or distributor of a voting system or component of a voting system may submit that system or component to the secretary of state for examination under RCW 29A.12.020.

[ 2003 c 111 s 303. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 19; 1982 c 40 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.33.051.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Severability—1982 c 40: See note following RCW 29A.12.020.